Illinois, session 104th, HB826.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Hotel Operators' Occupation Tax Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 145/1)  (from Ch. 120, par. 481b.31)7    Sec. 1. This Act may be cited as the the Hotel Operators' 8Occupation Tax Act. The tax herein imposed shall be in 9addition to all other occupation or privilege taxes imposed by 10the State of Illinois or by any municipal corporation or 11political subdivision thereof.12(Source: P.A. 86-1475.)